Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DEPREDATION COMPENSATION.new text end new text begin (a) $125,000 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for compensation for livestock destroyed or crippled by a wolf under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737. The commissioner may use up to $5,000 to reimburse expenses incurred by university extension educators to provide fair market values of destroyed or crippled livestock. If the commissioner receives federal funding to pay claims for destroyed or crippled livestock, an equivalent amount of this appropriation may be used to reimburse nonlethal prevention methods performed by federal wildlife services staff. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) $125,000 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for compensation for crop or fence damage caused by elk under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.7371. The commissioner may use up to $10,000 of the appropriation to reimburse expenses incurred by the commissioner or the commissioner's approved agent to investigate and resolve claims, as well as for costs associated with training for approved agents. The commissioner may use up to $40,000 of the appropriation to make grants to producers for measures to protect stored crops from elk damage. If the commissioner determines that claims made under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737 or 3.7371, are unusually high, amounts appropriated for either program may be transferred to the appropriation for the other program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end